New York, session 2025-2026, A9037.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds that 2 the charitable tax credit provides significant tax benefits to donors 3 contributing to the State University of New York Impact Foundation, 4 offering an eighty-five percent tax credit against New York state income 5 tax and a fifteen percent deduction against federal income tax. The 6 program has been highly successful in encouraging charitable donations 7 to the state university of New York (SUNY) system. 8 However, applications for the tax credit have exceeded the current ten 9 million dollar annual cap, which limits the ability to meet donor inter- 10 est and leverage further private contributions. In order to allow more 11 donors to participate and provide critical financial support to the SUNY 12 system, this legislation increases the annual cap of the program to 13 twenty million dollars. This will expand the program's capacity to meet 14 demand and provide continued financial support for SUNY's educational 15 programs, scholarships, and other institutional improvements. 16 § 2. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 1 of section 3 of part LL of chapter 17 59 of the laws of 2018 amending the state finance law relating to estab- 18 lishing the charitable gifts trust fund and the health charitable 19 account, and the elementary and secondary education charitable account, 20 is amended to read as follows: 21 (e) Contribution cap. The maximum permitted contributions under this 22 section available annually for calendar year two thousand eighteen [and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00088-01-5 A. 9037 2 1 all following years] through two thousand twenty-five shall be ten 2 million dollars and for calendar year two thousand twenty-six and all 3 following years shall be twenty million dollars for the SUNY foundation 4 and for calendar year two thousand eighteen and all following years 5 shall be ten million dollars for the CUNY foundation. 6 § 3. Reporting requirements. The state university of New York shall 7 annually submit a report to the governor and the legislature on the 8 total charitable monetary contributions to the State University of New 9 York Impact Foundation. Such report shall include: 10 1. The total amount of donations received; 11 2. A breakdown by institution; 12 3. The use of such funds; and 13 4. The impact of these contributions on educational resources, schol- 14 arships, and other institutional improvements. 15 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026.